North Carolina, session 2025, HB687.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 130A-280, as amended by Section 4.51 of S.L. 2024-49, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 130A-280. Scope.Scope, definitions, and exclusions.
(a) Scope. – This Article provides for the regulation of public swimming pools in the
State as they may affect the public health and safety.
(b) As used in this Article, the term "public swimming pool" means any Definitions. –
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Artificial swimming lagoon. – Any body of water used for recreational
purposes with more than 20,000 square feet of surface area, an artificial line,
and a method of disinfectant that results in a disinfectant residual in the
swimming zone that is protective of public health.
(2) Public swimming pool. – Any structure, chamber, or tank containing an
artificial body of water used by the public for swimming, diving, wading,
recreation, or therapy, together with buildings, appurtenances, and equipment
used in connection with the body of water, regardless of whether a fee is
charged for its use. The term includes municipal, school, hotel, motel,
apartment, boarding house, athletic club, or other membership facility pools
and spas, spas operating for display at temporary events, and artificial
swimming lagoons. As used in this Article, an "artificial swimming lagoon"
means any body of water used for recreational purposes with more than 20,000
square feet of surface area, an artificial liner, and a method of disinfectant that
results in a disinfectant residual in the swimming zone that is protective of the
public health.
(c) Exclusions. – This Article does not apply to any of the following:
(1) A private pool serving a single family dwelling and used only by the residents
of the dwelling and their guests.
(2) A private pool serving a single family dwelling meeting the minimum
requirements of this subdivision which is offered to, and used by, individuals
on a temporary basis utilizing a sharing economy platform. For the purposes
*H687-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of this subdivision, a sharing economy platform means an online platform
used to facilitate peer-to-peer transactions to acquire, provide, or share access
to goods and services. For the purposes of this subdivision, a pool must meet
all of the following minimum requirements:
a. Pools must have proper fencing and barriers to prevent unsupervised
access, especially by children. The fence should be at least 4 feet high
with a self-latching gate.
b. Pools must have clear and conspicuous signage posted around the pool
area specifying pool rules, depth markers, and any potential hazards.
c. Pools must be equipped with basic lifesaving equipment, including life
rings and reaching poles.
d. Pool decks and surrounding areas must have non-slip surfaces.
e. Pools must have properly fitted covers for all submerged suction
outlets.
f. Pools must be well-maintained with proper chemical balance and
cleanliness to ensure safe and healthy swimming conditions.
(3) Therapeutic pools used in physical therapy programs operated by medical
facilities licensed by the Department or operated by a licensed physical
therapist, nor to therapeutic chambers drained, cleaned, and refilled after each
individual use.
(4) Floatation or sensory deprivation systems certified by the National Sanitation
Foundation to meet the most current version of Standard 50 of the National
Sanitation Foundation/American National Standards Institute."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 687-First Edition